Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-578
Dark fiber;
violation; procedure; appeal.

In an original action
concerning a violation of any provision of sections 86-574 to 86-578 by an
agency or political subdivision of the state, the Public Service Commission
shall have the jurisdiction set forth in section 75-132.01. After all administrative
remedies before the Public Service Commission have been exhausted, an appeal
may be brought by an interested party. Such appeal shall be in accordance
with section 75-136.

Laws 2001, LB 827, § 5;

R.S.Supp.,2001, § 86-2305;

Laws 2002, LB 1105, § 348;

Laws 2003, LB 187, § 32;

Laws 2013, LB545, § 15.